en: Polish meat products
bg: Полски месни продукти
fr: Produits carnés polonais
hr: Polirati mesne proizvode
lt: Lenkiški mėsos produktai
pl: Polskie produkty mięsne

pl: Kiełbasa krakowska sucha staropolska
en: Krakowska
de: Krakauer
fr: Karkauer

pl: Kabanosy
en: Cabanossi
da: Kabanospølser
sv: Kabanosser

en: Lithuanian meat products
hr: Litvanski mesni proizvodi
lt: Lietuviški mėsos produktai
pl: Litewskie produkty mięsne

en: Skilandis, Kindziukas
hr: Skijalandis
lt: Skilandis, Kindziukas, Kindzius
pl: Kindziuk

en: Norwegian meat products
fr: Produits carnés norvégiens
hr: Norveški mesni proizvodi
lt: Norvegiški mėsos produktai
pl: Norweskie produkty mięsne

en: Portuguese meat products
fr: Produits carnés portugais
hr: Portugalski mesni proizvodi
lt: Portugališki mėsos produktai
pl: Portugalskie produkty mięsne

en: Romanian meat products
fr: Produits carnés roumains
hr: Rumunjski mesni proizvodi
lt: Rumuniški mėsos produktai
pl: Rumuńskie produkty mięsne

en: Slovenian meat products
fr: Produits carnés slovènes
hr: Slovenske mesne prerađevine
lt: Slovėniški mėsos produktai
pl: Słoweńskie produkty mięsne

sl: Kranjska klobasa
en: Carniolan sausage
de: Krainer Wurst

en: Spanish meat products
bg: Испански месни продукти
ca: Productes carnis espanyols
de: Spanische Fleischprodukte
es: Productos cárnicos españoles
fi: Espanjalaiset lihatuotteet
fr: Produits carnés espagnols
hr: Španjolski mesni proizvodi
it: Prodotti spagnoli a base di carne
lt: Ispaniški mėsos produktai
nl: Spaanse vleesproducten, Vleesproducten uit Spanje
pl: Hiszpańskie produkty mięsne

en: Serrano ham, Dry-cured Serrano ham, Jamón serrano
bg: Шунка Серрано
ca: Pernil salat, Pernil serrà
es: Jamón Serrano
fi: Vuoristokinkku, Serranokinkku, Serranon kinkku, Jamón serrano
fr: Jambons Serrano, jambon serrano, Jambon sec Serrano
hr: Serano šunka
it: Prosciutto Serrano Stagionato
nl: Serranoham
pl: Jamón serrano, Szynka serrano
pt: Presuntos serranos

en: Duroc ham
ca: Pernil Duroc
es: Jamón Duroc
hr: Duroc šunka

en: Sobrassada
es: Sobrasada de Mallorca, sobrasada

en: Cecina de León
es: Cecina de León, cecina

en: Chinese prepared meats
fr: Charcuterie chinoise

en: Jinhua ham
fr: jambon de Jinhua

en: Xuanwei ham
fr: jambon de Xuanwei

en: Ossenworst, Amsterdam ossenworst
nl: Ossenworst

en: Sujuk
fr: Soudjouk
tr: Sucuk